Missouri, session 2026, HB3469.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 67.1190, to read as follows:
67.1190. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Campground" or "campsite", real property, other than state-owned
property, which contains parcels for rent to transient guests for pay or compensation,
which may include temporary utility hook-ups for use by the transient guests, and
where such transient guests generally use tents, recreational vehicles, or some other
form of temporary shelter while on the rented premises and shall also include
recreational vehicles parks;
(2) "County", a county with more than seven thousand but fewer than eight
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four hundred eighty but
fewer than one thousand inhabitants;
(3) "Transient guest", a person or persons who occupy a room or rooms in a
hotel, motel, or resort for thirty-one days or less during any calendar quarter;
(4) "Watercraft", any canoe, kayak, raft, or tube, as such terms are defined
under section 537.327, propelled by the use of paddles, oars, hands, poles, or other
nonmechanical, nonmotorized means of propulsion.
2. (1) The governing body of a county may impose, by order or ordinance, a
surcharge tax on watercraft rentals and on the charges for all sleeping rooms, guest
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3469 2
rooms, cabins, or campsites, or other transient guest accommodations paid by transient
guests of hotels, motels, campgrounds, resorts, bed and breakfast inns, tourist courts,
short-term residential dwelling rentals, or other transient accommodations or lodging
establishments situated within the county or a portion thereof.
(2) The surcharge authorized under this section shall be:
(a) Equal to five percent of the costs of such rentals;
(b) In addition to the charge for the sleeping room and shall be in addition to any
and all other taxes; and
(c) Stated separately from all other charges and taxes.
(3) The proceeds of such surcharge tax shall be used by the county for general
revenue purposes.
3. (1) Such surcharge shall not become effective unless the governing body of the
county submits to the voters of the county, at any election available for the county, a
proposal to authorize the governing body of the county to impose the surcharge under
this section.
(2) If a majority of the votes cast on the proposal by the qualified voters voting
thereon are in favor of the proposal, the surcharge shall become effective on the first day
of the second calendar quarter following the calendar quarter in which the election was
held. If a majority of the votes cast on the question by the qualified voters voting
thereon are opposed to the proposal, the tax shall not become effective unless and until
the question is resubmitted under this section to the qualified voters and such question is
approved by a majority of the qualified voters voting on the question.
4. (1) Every retailer, vendor, operator, and other person who sells goods and
services subject to the surcharge imposed under this section shall be liable and
responsible for the payment of surcharges due and shall make a return and remit such
surcharges to the county, at such times and in such manner as the governing body of the
county shall prescribe. The collection of the surcharges imposed by this section shall be
computed in accordance with schedules or systems approved by the governing body of
the county.
(2) An intermediary platform that facilitates the rental of a short-term
residential dwelling rental to and collects payment from a transient guest, may enter
into an agreement with the department of revenue and the county to collect and remit
the surcharge tax authorized under this section, subject to the provisions of sections
32.085 to 32.087, sections 136.010 to 136.380, and sections 144.010 to 144.525 and any

HB 3469 3
provisions or rules promulgated by the department and the county for the enforcement
of this section.
✔